Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6089.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 4. (1) A rental agreement shall state the must include all of the following: (a) The name and address at which notice required under this act shall must be given to the lessor. (b) (2) A rental agreement shall state notice in a prominent place in type not smaller than the size of 12-point type, or in legible print with letters not smaller than 1/8 inch, a notice in substantially the following form: "NOTICE: Michigan law establishes rights and obligations for parties to rental agreements. This agreement is required to comply with the Truth in Renting Act. If you have a question about the interpretation or legality of a provision of this agreement, you may want to seek assistance from a lawyer or other qualified person." (c) A statement that if the landlord intends to increase the rent at the end of the lease, the landlord must provide a written notice of the increase to the affected tenants at least 90 days before the date the increased rent takes effect.